Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-508
Clerk magistrate; duties; qualifications; education requirements.

(1) Clerk magistrates may be assigned by the presiding county judge to perform the duties of a clerk magistrate in any other county within the district.

(2) A person shall be eligible for appointment as a clerk magistrate if he or she is a graduate of a high school or holds a certificate of equivalency issued by the State Board of Education.

(3) A clerk magistrate shall comply with the Supreme Court judicial branch education requirements as required by the Supreme Court.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 8;

Laws 1974, LB 735, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 3.